New York, session 2025-2026, S9337.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil practice law and rules is amended by adding a new 2 section 516 to read as follows: 3 § 516. Actions or proceedings involving section one of article nine- 4 teen of the state constitution. 1. Notwithstanding any other law to the 5 contrary, in any action or proceeding involving section one of article 6 nineteen of the state constitution, venue shall be proper only in one of 7 the following designated courts in a judicial department within which at 8 least one plaintiff is located: 9 (a) first judicial department: New York county; 10 (b) second judicial department: Westchester county; 11 (c) third judicial department: Albany county; or 12 (d) fourth judicial department: Erie county. 13 2. For purposes of this section, an action or proceeding involving 14 section one of article nineteen of the state constitution shall include 15 but not be limited to an action or proceeding involving any claim, coun- 16 ter-claim, cross-claim, defense, or affirmative defense raised by any 17 party related to the process for proposing a constitutional amendment, 18 the process by which a constitutional amendment is placed on the ballot, 19 the manner in which a constitutional amendment appears on the ballot, an 20 election related to a constitutional amendment, or the interpretation of 21 an enacted constitutional amendment. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14677-01-6